Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [115.85] WATER ACCESS REPORT REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Appropriate agency" means: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of health for a public water supply; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a publicly owned treatment works. new text end new text begin (c) "Public water supply" has the meaning given to public water system in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, United States Code, title 42, section 300f, clause (4). new text end new text begin (d) "Water access report" means a report containing the information described in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) "Water utility" means any of the following operating in this state: new text end new text begin (1) a public water supply; or new text end new text begin (2) a publicly owned treatment works. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin Each year by March 1, a water utility must submit to the appropriate agency a water access report that: new text end new text begin (1) explains the policies the water utility had in place during the previous calendar year with respect to each of the following, including information about the method, content, and frequency with which information about each was communicated to customers: new text end new text begin (i) late payments and termination of service and related fees and charges; new text end new text begin (ii) payment plan options; new text end new text begin (iii) any alternative rate structures or available financial assistance; and new text end new text begin (iv) local ordinances that control any of the policies described in items (i) to (iii); new text end new text begin (2) includes the following information for the previous calendar year, stated separately for residential, commercial, and industrial accounts: new text end new text begin (i) total number of accounts; new text end new text begin (ii) total number of accounts terminated or suspended for nonpayment; and new text end new text begin (iii) number of accounts terminated or suspended for nonpayment, stated separately for nonpayment of water bill, nonpayment of wastewater bill, and nonpayment of both and broken out by month of termination or suspension; and new text end new text begin (3) includes the following additional information: new text end new text begin (i) contact information for the water utility that customers can use to discuss bills, seek assistance, or address termination of service; new text end new text begin (ii) a balance sheet, income statement, and cash flow statement for the most recently concluded fiscal year; and new text end new text begin (iii) when applicable, an explanation of the reason that the water utility is unable to supply any of the information required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Posting required. new text end new text begin The appropriate agency must post a water access report received from a water utility on the agency's website. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Providing information. new text end new text begin Any person that possesses information that must be included in a report required under subdivision 2 must provide that information to the reporting water utility upon request. new text end